sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Dodatki za biometrične monitorje > Dodatki za merilnike krvnega tlaka: Prenosni etuiji za merilnike krvnega tlaka; Cevi in balončki za manšete merilnikov krvnega tlaka; Manšete za merilnike krvnega tlaka; Napajalni adapterji za merilnike krvnega tlaka
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องตรวจสอบชีวมิติ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องตรวจสอบความดันโลหิต: กระเป๋าใส่เครื่องวัดความดันโลหิต; สายลมและลูกบอลสูบลมปลอกแขนวัดความดัน; ส่วนพันแขนของเครื่องตรวจสอบความดันโลหิต; อะแดปเตอร์ไฟฟ้าเครื่องวัดความดันโลหิต
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Acessórios de monitorização biométrica > Acessórios de monitorização da pressão arterial: Estojos de transporte para tensiómetros; Tubos e peras de insuflação para braçadeiras de tensiómetros; Mangas de monitorização da pressão arterial; Adaptadores de corrente para tensiómetros
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Phụ kiện thiết bị theo dõi sinh trắc > Phụ kiện máy theo dõi huyết áp: Hộp đựng máy đo huyết áp; Ống vòng bít và bóng bơm máy đo huyết áp; Đai dùng cho máy theo dõi huyết áp; Bộ nguồn máy đo huyết áp
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Accessoires pour moniteurs biométriques > Accessoires pour tensiomètres: Étuis de transport pour tensiomètres; Tubulures et poires de gonflage pour brassards de tensiomètre; Brassards de tensiomètres; Adaptateurs secteur pour tensiomètres
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Príslušenstvo pre biometrické monitory > Príslušenstvo k tlakomeru: Prenosné puzdrá na tlakomery; Hadice a balóniky k manžetám tlakomerov; Manžety tlakomera; Napájacie adaptéry pre tlakomer
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Biometrikus felügyeleti eszköz kiegészítők > Vérnyomásmérő-kiegészítők: Vérnyomásmérő hordozótokok; Vérnyomásmérő tartozékok; Vérnyomásmérő mandzsetta; Vérnyomásmérő hálózati adapterek
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Akcesoria do monitorów funkcji życiowych > Akcesoria do ciśnieniomierzy: Etui do przenoszenia ciśnieniomierzy; Węże i gruszki do mankietów ciśnieniomierza; Rękawy do ciśnieniomierzy; Zasilacze do ciśnieniomierzy
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Accesorii monitor biometric > Accesorii pentru monitorul tensiunii arteriale: Huse de transport pentru monitoare de tensiune arterială; Furtunuri și perne de umflare pentru monitoare de tensiune; Manșon pentru monitorul tensiunii arteriale; Adaptoare de alimentare pentru monitoare de tensiune
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Accessoires voor biometrische meters > Accessoires voor bloeddrukmonitoren: Bloeddrukmeter draaghoezen; Bloeddrukmeter manchet slangen en opblaasperen; Manchetten voor bloeddrukmonitoren; Bloeddrukmeter stroomadapters
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Pribor za biometrijske monitore > Pribor za mjerač krvnog tlaka: Futrole za tlakomjere; Crijeva i pumpice za manžete tlakomjera; Manžete za mjerač krvnog tlaka; Adapteri za napajanje tlakomjera
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Tillbehör till biometrimätare > Tillbehör till blodtrycksmätare: Blodtrycksmätarväskor; Blodtrycksmätarmanschettslangar och uppblåsningsbollar; Blodtrycksmanschetter; Blodtrycksmätarströmadaptrar
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Zubehör für biometrische Messgeräte > Zubehör für Blutdrucküberwachungsgeräte: Blutdruckmessgerät-Tragetaschen; Blutdruckmessgerät-Manschettenschläuche & -Pumpbälle; Blutdruckmanschetten; Blutdruckmessgerät-Netzadapter
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Biyometrik Monitör Aksesuarları > Tansiyon Aleti Aksesuarları: Tansiyon Aleti Taşıma Çantaları; Tansiyon Aleti Manşon Hortumları ve Şişirme Balonları; Tansiyon Aleti Kollukları; Tansiyon Aleti Güç Adaptörleri
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Аксессуары для инструментов для измерения биометрических показателей > Аксессуары для тонометров: Чехлы для тонометров; Шланги манжеты и груши для накачивания тонометров; Манжеты для тонометров; Адаптеры питания для тонометров
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Αξεσουάρ βιομετρικής οθόνης > Αξεσουάρ για πιεσόμετρα: Θήκες μεταφοράς πιεσόμετρου; Σωλήνες και αεροβόλα περιχειρίδας; Περιβραχιόνια για πιεσόμετρα; Τροφοδοτικά πιεσόμετρου
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 生物監測器配件 > 血壓監測器配件: 血壓計收納盒; 血壓計臂帶橡皮管及充氣球; 血壓監測機環帶; 血壓計電源適配器
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 生物体征监测器配件 > 血压计配件: 血压计便携包; 血压计袖带软管和充气球; 血压计袖带; 血压计电源适配器
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Accesorios para dispositivos biométricos > Accesorios para monitores de tensión arterial: Estuches de transporte de tensiómetro; Mangueras de brazalete y peras de inflado de tensiómetro; Manguitos para medición de tensión arterial; Adaptadores de corriente de tensiómetro
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Tilbehør for biometrisk overvåkning > Tilbehør til blodtrykksapparater: Blodtrykksmåler bærevesker; Mansjettslanger og oppblåsningspærer til blodtrykksmålere; Mansjetter for blodtrykksovervåkning; Blodtrykksmåler strømadaptere
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Аксесоари за биометрични монитори > Аксесоари за апарат за кръвно налягане: Чанти за апарат за кръвно налягане; Маркучи и балони за маншони на апарат за кръвно налягане; Маншети за апарати за кръвно налягане; Захранващи адаптери за апарат за кръвно налягане
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Biometric Monitor Accessories > Blood Pressure Monitor Accessories: Blood Pressure Monitor Carrying Cases; Blood Pressure Monitor Cuff Hoses & Inflation Bulbs; Blood Pressure Monitor Cuffs; Blood Pressure Monitor Power Adapters
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Accessori lettori biometrici > Accessori per misuratori di pressione sanguigna: Custodie di trasporto per sfigmomanometri; Tubi per bracciale e palloncini di gonfiaggio dello sfigmomanometro; Polsini per misuratori di pressione sanguigna; Adattatori di alimentazione dello sfigmomanometro
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Měřiče tělesných funkcí – příslušenství > Monitory krevního tlaku – příslušenství: Přepravní pouzdra na tlakoměry; Hadice a balónky k manžetám tlakoměrů; Manžety k monitorům krevního tlaku; Napájecí adaptéry pro tlakoměry
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 医療用測定器関連用品 > 血圧計関連用品: 血圧計用携帯ケース; 血圧計用カフホース・送気球; 血圧計用腕帯; 血圧計用電源アダプター
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Biometrinių monitorių priedai > Kraujo spaudimo monitorių priedai: Kraujospūdžio matuoklio nešiojimo dėklai; Kraujospūdžio matuoklio manžetės žarnelės ir pripūtimo pompos; Kraujo spaudimo monitorių manžetės; Kraujospūdžio matuoklio maitinimo adapteriai
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Tilbehør til biometriske målere > Tilbehør til blodtryksmålere: Blodtryksmåler – opbevaringsetuier; Blodtryksmåler – manchetslanger og pumpeballer; Manchetter til blodtryksmålere; Blodtryksmåler – strømadaptere
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Biometrisen monitorin lisätarvikkeet > Verenpainemittarin lisätarvikkeet: Verenpainemittarin kantokotelo; Verenpainemittarin mansettiletku ja pumppu; Verenpainemittarin mansetit; Verenpainemittarin verkkolaite
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Acessórios para monitor biométrico > Acessórios de monitoramento da pressão arterial: Estojos para monitor de pressão arterial; Mangueiras e bulbos de inflação para monitor de pressão; Braceletes de monitoramento da pressão arterial; Adaptadores de energia para monitor de pressão arterial
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 생체신호 모니터 부대용품 > 혈압 측정기 부대용품: 혈압 모니터 휴대 케이스; 혈압 모니터 커프 호스 및 팽창 벌브; 혈압 측정기 밴드; 혈압 모니터 전원 어댑터